Utah statutes.
59-14-301.   Registration and licensing -- Fee -- Bond exceptions.
(1)  All manufacturers and distributors of all tobacco products, as defined in
Section 59-14-102, who are responsible for the collection of tax on tobacco
products under this chapter, and all retailers of all tobacco products shall:
(a)  register with the commission; and
(b)  be licensed by the commission under Section 59-14-202.
(2) A fee may not be charged for registration and licensing of manufacturers,
jobbers, distributors, or retailers of tobacco products in addition to the
cigarette license if such a license is required.
(3)  The commission shall require any manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer, or
any other person subject to this section, and who is responsible for the
collection of tax on tobacco products under this chapter, to post a bond as a
prerequisite to registering.  The bond shall be in a form and an amount
determined by the commission.  If the bond is required under Section
59-14-201, the bond may be a combination, the minimum amount of which shall be
$1,000.
